Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Regular Elections

120.155.
Contest of regular election of officers other than Governor, Lieutenant Governor, General Assembly member and certain city officers.

Any candidate for election to any state, county, district or city office (except the office of Governor, Lieutenant Governor, member of the General Assembly, and those city offices as to which there are other provisions made by law for determining contest elections), for whom a number of votes was cast equal to not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the number of votes cast for the successful candidate for the office, may contest the election of the successful candidate, by filing a petition in the Circuit Court of the county where the contestee resides, unless the officer is one (1) elected by the voters of the whole state, in which case the petition shall be filed in the Franklin Circuit Court.

The petition shall be filed and process issued within thirty (30) days after the day of election.

The petition shall state the grounds of the contest relied on, and no other grounds shall afterwards be relied upon.

The contestee shall file an answer within twenty (20) days after the service of summons upon him or her.

The answer may consist of a denial of the averments of the petition and may also set up grounds of contest against the contestant; if grounds are so set up they shall be specifically pointed out and none other shall thereafter be relied upon by the party.

Any candidate who would have been qualified to bring a contest action under this section, who is a party to a requested recount proceeding under KRS 120.185(1), may, by filing answer in the recount proceeding within the time allowed by this section for filing grounds of contest, set forth grounds of contest against the petitioner in the recount proceeding.

A reply may be filed within ten (10) days after the answer is filed; its affirmative allegations shall be treated as controverted, and no subsequent pleading shall be allowed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 163; 2021 ch. 197, § 85, effective June 29, 2021.

120.157.
Automatic recount — Determination by State Board of Elections — Custody of materials — Proceedings of county board of elections — Costs.

In any regular election or special election for any member of the General Assembly, the United States Senate or the United States House of Representatives, Governor and Lieutenant Governor, Treasurer, Auditor of Public Accounts, Commissioner of Agriculture, Labor and Statistics, Secretary of State, and Attorney General, a recount of the vote shall be required when a candidate is defeated by a margin of not more than one-half of one percent (0.5%) of the votes cast for the office.

The State Board of Elections shall determine whether a recount is required under this section based upon the total number of votes certified to the Secretary of State. The time for conducting the recount under this section shall be as follows:

For the offices of Governor and Lieutenant Governor, no recanvass under KRS

117.305

shall be made. The recount shall be commenced not later than 9 a.m. local time on the Tuesday following the election and shall be conducted in the manner provided under subsections (3) to (7) of this section. The recount shall be completed within fourteen (14) days, Sundays excluded; and

For all other offices listed in subsection (1) of this section, the recount shall be commenced not later than 9 a.m. local time on the second Tuesday following the election and shall be conducted in the manner provided under subsections (3) to (7) of this section. The recount shall be completed within fourteen (14) days, Sundays excluded.

The custody of the voting equipment, ballots, boxes, and all papers pertaining to the election shall be maintained by the county board of elections. The voting equipment shall remain continuously locked, and the ballot boxes containing all paper ballots shall remain continuously locked as required by KRS

117.295

until the time set for the recount. The keys shall remain in the possession of the county board of elections until the time set for the recount.

The recount shall be conducted by the county board of elections of each county in which votes for the office that is the subject of the recount were cast.

At the recount, each political party represented on the county board of elections may appoint a representative to be present, and each candidate subject to the recount may be present, either in person or by a representative, or both. The county board of elections shall authorize representatives of the news media to observe the recount.

On the day fixed for the recount, the county board of elections shall meet and, after confirming the integrity of the ballots, shall proceed to recount the ballots.

The county board of elections shall complete the recount within the time established under subsection (2) of this section. Upon completion of the recount, the county board of elections shall file and enter of record the results of the recount, and shall certify the results of the recount of the total number of votes to the Secretary of State not later than 4 p.m., local time, on the day following the completion of the recount, Sunday excluded. No certificate of election shall be issued by the State Board of Elections while the recount is pending.

The costs of any recount held pursuant to this section shall be paid by the Commonwealth of Kentucky. The costs shall be deemed a necessary government expense and shall be paid from the general fund surplus account under KRS

48.700

or the budget reserve trust fund account under KRS

48.705

.

If a recount is conducted under subsection (1) of this section:

The time for filing a contest petition shall be tolled until the vote is certified under subsection (7) of this section; and

The candidate may initiate an election contest, but no request for an additional recount shall be considered prior to the completion of the certification of the vote under subsection (7) of this section.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 197, § 80, effective June 29, 2021.

120.160.
Notification
of nominees by Secretary of State. [Repealed.]

120.165.
Procedure in contest of regular election — Trial — Judgment.

A contest instituted under KRS

120.155

shall proceed as equity actions. Upon return of the summons properly executed to the office of the circuit clerk, he or she shall immediately docket the case and notify the presiding judge of the court that the contest has been filed. The judge shall proceed to a trial of the cause without delay. In courts having more than one (1) judge, the judge who shall try the case shall be determined by lot. The court shall complete the case as soon as practicable. The action shall have precedence over all other cases.

The evidence in chief for the contestant shall be completed within thirty (30) days after service of summons; the evidence for the contestee shall be completed within twenty-five (25) days after filing of answer, and evidence for contestant in rebuttal shall be completed within seven (7) days after the contestee has concluded; provided that for cause the court may grant a reasonable extension of time to either party.

All voting machines, voting equipment, or voting systems, ballots, stub books, and other papers concerning which there is any ground for contest may be removed to the court in which the action is pending.

If it appears from an inspection of the whole record that there has been such fraud, intimidation, bribery, or violence in the conduct of the election that neither contestant nor contestee can be judged to have been fairly elected, the Circuit Court, or an appellate court, on appeal, may adjudge that there has been no election. In that event the office shall be deemed vacant, with the same legal effect as if the person elected had refused to qualify. If one (1) of the parties is adjudged by the court to be elected to the office, he or she shall, on production of a copy of the final judgment, be permitted to qualify or be commissioned.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 164; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 136, effective January 2, 1978; 2021 ch. 197, § 68, effective June 29, 2021.

120.170.
Candidates
required to make deposit with Secretary of State — Refund — Escheat
to Commonwealth. [Repealed.]

120.175.
Appeal
to Court of Appeals.

Any party may appeal to the
Court of Appeals from a judgment entered under KRS

120.155

, in the same manner
as provided in KRS

120.075

, all of the provisions of which statute shall be
applicable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 165.

120.180.
Secretary
of State to place candidates’ names on ballot. [Repealed.]

120.185.
Recount of election of officers referred to in KRS 120.155 — Petition — Recount proceeding — Appeals — General Assembly action regarding findings of court.

Any candidate who was voted for at a regular election for any of the offices to which KRS

120.155

applies, and who does not qualify for an automatic recount under KRS

120.157

, may request a recount of the ballots by filing a petition with the same court where petitions of contest are required to be filed.
(1) (a) 1. Any candidate who was voted for at a regular election for any of the offices to which KRS

120.155

applies, and who does not qualify for an automatic recount under KRS

120.157

, may request a recount of the ballots by filing a petition with the same court where petitions of contest are required to be filed.

If the candidate is qualified to institute a contest proceeding under KRS 120.155, the candidate may request a recount by including a recount request in his or her petition instituting the contest proceeding.

Any candidate who is a contestee in a contest proceeding under KRS 120.155 may request a recount in his or her answer filed in the contest proceeding, but only if the answer containing the recount request is filed within five (5) days after service of the petition upon the contestee.

Any candidate under this subsection who would receive a certificate of election from the county board of elections under KRS

118.425

shall file his or her petition requesting a recount not later than ten (10) days after the day of the election. The county board of elections shall be named a party defendant in the petition.

Any candidate under this subsection who would receive a certificate of election from the State Board of Elections under KRS

118.425

shall file his or her petition requesting a recount not later than the second Tuesday following the election. The State Board of Elections shall be named a party defendant in the petition.

The party requesting the recount shall execute bond with approved surety for the costs of the recount, in an amount to be fixed by the Circuit Judge. The bond may be filed by the state political party, political organization, or political group, if any, to which the candidate is affiliated. Upon the bond being filed, the clerk shall immediately notify the Circuit Judge of the request and the filing of the bond, and the judge shall at once enter an order directing the voting machines, voting equipment, or voting system, ballots, boxes, and all papers pertaining to the election be secured. The court shall further order that the voting equipment, voting system, and ballot boxes containing all paper ballots shall remain continuously locked as required by KRS

117.295

until the time set for the recount. The keys shall remain in the custody and possession of the county board of elections until the time set for the recount.

The Circuit Court shall fix a day for the recount proceedings to begin. A copy of the order shall be served upon the parties or their counsel in the same manner as notices are required to be served, which shall be deemed sufficient notice of the proceeding.

At the recount, each political party represented on the county board of elections may appoint a representative to be present, and each candidate subject to the recount may be present, either in person or by a representative, or both. The county board of elections shall authorize representatives of the news media to observe the recount.

On the day fixed by the court, the county board of elections shall meet and after confirming the integrity of the ballots, shall proceed to recount the ballots.

The county board of elections shall complete the recount as soon as practicable, and shall forward the results of the recount to the Circuit Court.

Upon receipt of the results of the recount, the court shall enter a judgment setting out the results of the recount, and directing the State Board of Elections or county board of elections, whichever would issue the certificate of election, to issue the certificate to the party entitled thereto as shown by the recount.

No certificate of election shall be issued by the State Board of Elections or any county board of elections while any recount proceeding is pending, and any certificate of election issued before the final judgment in any recount proceeding shall be null and void.

Any party may appeal from the judgment issued under paragraph (j) of this subsection to the Court of Appeals, in the same manner as provided in KRS

120.075

, and all of the provisions of that statute shall apply.

If a proceeding for recount is requested and prosecuted in a contest proceeding, the recount shall not await the preparation or trial of the contest in the Circuit Court or in the Court of Appeals. The action of the courts shall be final as to the question of a recount of the ballots under this subsection, and certificates shall then be issued to the parties entitled thereto.

Any slate of candidates for Governor and Lieutenant Governor, or any candidate for the United States Senate or the United States House of Representatives who was voted for at a regular election or a special election, and who does not qualify for an automatic recount under KRS

120.157

, may request a recount of the ballots by filing a petition in the Franklin Circuit Court.

For any slate of candidates for Governor and Lieutenant Governor, the petition requesting a recount shall be filed not later than the Tuesday following the election. No recanvass under KRS

117.305

shall be conducted. The court shall order the recount to commence at 9 a.m. local time not later than a date five (5) days after the filing of the petition. The recount shall be completed by the county board of elections within fourteen (14) days of commencement of the recount, Sundays excluded. The State Board of Elections shall be named a party defendant in the petition.

For any candidate for the United States Senate or the United States House of Representatives, the petition requesting a recount shall be filed not later than the second Tuesday following the election. The State Board of Elections shall be named a party defendant in the petition.

Except for the time requirements established under paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, the recount shall proceed as provided in subsection (1)(e) to (j) of this section.

No appeal shall be taken from the findings issued by the Franklin Circuit Court described in subsection (1)(j) of this section; however, any party aggrieved by the findings or action of the court may file a petition for contest to the General Assembly under KRS

120.195

, and the General Assembly may accept, modify, or disregard the findings of the court in its sole and absolute discretion.

No certificate of election shall be issued by the State Board of Elections while any recount proceeding or contest proceeding is pending, and if issued before entry of the findings described in paragraph (e) of this subsection shall be null and void.

Any candidate for the United States Senate or the United States House of Representatives aggrieved by the findings or action of the court shall proceed under the rules established by the United States Congress or federal law.

Any candidate for the General Assembly who was voted for at a regular election or special election, and who does not qualify for an automatic recount under KRS

120.157

, may request a recount of the ballots by filing a petition in the Circuit Court of the county where the requesting candidate resides.

The petition requesting a recount shall be filed not later than the second Tuesday following the election. The State Board of Elections shall be named a party defendant in the petition.

The recount shall proceed as provided in subsection (1)(e) to (j) of this section.

No appeal shall be taken from the findings issued by the court described in subsection (1)(j) of this section; however, any party aggrieved by the findings or action of the court may file a petition for contest to the General Assembly under KRS

120.195

, and the General Assembly may accept, modify, or disregard the findings of the court in its sole and absolute discretion.

No certificate of election shall be issued by the State Board of Elections while any recount proceeding or contest proceeding is pending, and if issued before entry of the findings described in subsection (1)(j) of this section shall be null and void.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 166; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 137, effective January 2, 1978; 1992, ch. 288, § 54, effective July 14, 1992; 2021 ch. 197, § 69, effective June 29, 2021.

120.190.
Secretary
of State to certify results of preference primary. [Repealed.]

120.195.
Contest of election by slate of candidates for Governor and Lieutenant Governor or by candidate for General Assembly.

Any slate of candidates for Governor and Lieutenant Governor may contest any regular election or special election to the General Assembly by filing a written application and notice of the contest with the clerk of the Senate and with the clerk of the House of Representatives of the General Assembly. The application and notice of contest shall be signed by the parties contesting the election, and:

If contesting a regular election, the application and notice of contest shall:

Be filed not later than thirty (30) days after the final action of the State Board of Elections; or

Be filed not later than thirty (30) days following entry of the findings of the Franklin Circuit Court as provided in KRS 120.185(2) if a recount was conducted; and

If contesting a special election, the application and notice of contest shall be filed not later than seven (7) days after the final action of the State Board of Elections.

Any candidate for the General Assembly may contest any regular election or special election to the General Assembly by filing a written application and notice of the contest with the clerk of the house to which the candidate seeks election. The application and notice of contest shall be signed by the party contesting the election, and:

If contesting a regular election, the application and notice of contest shall:

Be filed not later than fifteen (15) days after the final action of the State Board of Elections; or

Be filed not later than fifteen (15) days following entry of the findings entered by the Circuit Court as provided in KRS 120.185(3) if a recount was conducted; and

If contesting a special election, the application and notice of contest shall be filed not later than three (3) days following the final action of the State Board of Elections.

The application and notice required under subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall state the grounds of the contest, and no grounds other than those stated in the application and notice shall be heard as coming from that party following the filing of the application and notice. The candidate filing the application and notice may include a request for a recount which may be ordered by the board selected to try the contest under KRS

120.205

or

120.215

.

No election contest shall be heard unless the contestee to the proceeding has been served with a copy of the application and notice of contest. The contestee may make defense without giving counternotice.

No certificate of election shall be issued by the State Board of Elections while any election contest is pending, and any certificate issued before, during, or after final resolution by the board of any election contest filed under this section shall be null and void.

Immediately after the filing of the application and notice of contest, either party may proceed to take proof by depositions, under the same rules and regulations that govern the taking of depositions in actions in equity, except that no commission shall be required for taking a deposition out of the state. The depositions shall be sealed by the officer taking them, and directed to the clerk of the Senate or clerk of the House, as the case may require. The depositions properly taken shall be read as evidence before the board or house of the General Assembly having jurisdiction of the case, and the board or house may call for and hear other proof as either shall determine. The taking of depositions to be used before the board or house of the General Assembly shall close ten (10) days before the next meeting of the General Assembly, or, if the General Assembly is in session when the application and notice is filed, when the board or house orders the taking of proof by deposition to close.

The costs of the proceeding shall be adjudged against the unsuccessful party, and a certificate of costs shall be given by the clerk of the Senate or the clerk of the House to the parties to the contest or their attorneys, as the case requires, and shall be paid to the prevailing party within thirty (30) days of adjudication. If the costs are not timely paid, the prevailing party may seek entry of a judgment in a Circuit Court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 167; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 138, effective January 2, 1978; 1992, ch. 288, § 55, effective July 14, 1992; 2021 ch. 197, § 82, effective June 29, 2021.

120.200.
Distribution
of authorized delegate vote among party candidates. [Repealed.]

120.205.
Board for determining contest of election of Governor and Lieutenant Governor.

When the election of a Governor and Lieutenant Governor is contested, a board for determining the contest shall be formed and shall proceed in the following manner:

On the third day after the organization of the General Assembly that meets next after the election, the Senate shall select three (3) of its members as provided in subsection (2) of this section, and the House of Representatives shall select eight (8) of its members as provided in subsection (2) of this section, and the eleven (11) so selected shall constitute a board to try the contest, seven (7) of whom shall constitute a quorum;

In making the selection, the name of each member present shall be written on a separate piece of paper, every piece being as nearly similar to the other as possible. Each piece shall be rolled up so that the names thereon cannot be seen, nor any particular piece ascertained or selected by feeling. The whole, so prepared, shall be placed by the clerk in a box on clerk’s table, and after it has been well shaken, and the papers therein well intermixed, the clerk shall draw out one (1) paper, which shall be opened and read aloud by the presiding officer, and so on until the required number is obtained;

If any member selected swears that he or she cannot, without great personal inconvenience, serve on the board, or that he or she feels an undue bias for or against either of the parties, that member may be excused by the house from which that member was chosen from serving on the board. If it appears that a selected member is related to either party, or is liable to any other proper objection on the score of his or her partiality, that member shall be excused. Any deficiency in the proper number created by excuse shall be supplied by another draw from the box;

The selected members of the board shall be sworn by the Speaker of the House of Representatives to try the contested election, and shall give true judgment according to the evidence, unless dissolved before rendering judgment;

The board shall, within twenty-four (24) hours after its selection, meet, appoint its chair, and assign a day for hearing the contest. It may adjourn from day to day as its business requires. If any member of the board willfully fails to attend its sessions, that member shall be reported to the house to which he or she belongs, and that house shall then, in its discretion, punish that member by fine or imprisonment, or both;

The board may, upon a majority of vote, send for persons, papers, and records, including all voting equipment, ballots, boxes, and precinct rosters. The board may issue subpoenas signed by its chair or the Speaker of the House of Representatives;

The board may use the services of any law enforcement agency to transport all records relating to the election contest, including voting equipment, ballots, boxes, and precinct rosters. All voting equipment, ballots, boxes, precinct rosters, and other voting records sent for by the board shall be sealed, to the extent possible, and transmitted in a tamper-resistant manner. The chain of custody for the records shall be recorded, in writing, on a form prescribed by the State Board of Elections in administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A to include the identity of the person or persons transferring and receiving the records, and the date, time, and location of the transfer. The clerk of the House of Representatives shall be designated by the board as the custodian of the records while the records are in the possession of the board;

If it appears that the slates of candidates receiving the highest number of votes cast have received an equal number, the right to the offices shall be determined by lot, in the manner prescribed by the board, and under the direction of the board;

If the person returned for the Office of Governor is found not legally qualified to receive the office at the time of his or her election, a new election shall be ordered to fill the vacancy under subsection (13) of this section;

If a slate of candidates other than the one returned is found to have received the highest number of legal votes cast, that slate shall be adjudged by the General Assembly to be the persons elected and entitled to the offices;

No decision shall be made but by the vote of at least six (6) members of the board. The decision of the board shall not be final or conclusive, but shall be reported to the two (2) houses of the General Assembly, in joint session, for the further action of the General Assembly. The Speaker of the House shall preside at the joint session, and the General Assembly shall then determine the contest;

If no decision of the board is given during the then session of the General Assembly, the board shall be dissolved, unless by joint resolution of the two (2) houses it is empowered to continue longer;

If a new election is required, it shall be immediately ordered by proclamation of the Speaker of the House, who shall issue a writ of election. The writ shall be signed by the Speaker, shall designate the day for holding the election, and shall be directed to the proper sheriff or sheriffs as provided in KRS

118.740

; and

When a new election is ordered, or the incumbent is adjudged not to be entitled to the office, his or her power shall immediately cease, and if the office is not adjudged to another, it shall be deemed vacant.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 168; 2021 ch. 197, § 83, effective June 29, 2021.

120.210.
Notice
to political party’s national committee. [Repealed.]

120.215.
Board to determine contest of election of member of General Assembly.

When the election of a member of the General Assembly is contested, the house to which he or she belongs or seeks to be a member shall, within three (3) days after its organization, and in the manner provided in KRS

120.205

, select a board of not more than nine (9) nor less than five (5) of its members to determine the contest.

The number of members required for the board shall be determined by the presiding officer of the house to which the person filing the contest belongs or seeks to be a member, and announced to the house prior to the selection of any member of the board, a majority of whom shall constitute a quorum.

The members selected to serve on the board as provided in this section shall be sworn by the presiding officer to try the contested election, and shall give true judgment according to the evidence, unless dissolved before rendering judgment.

The board shall be governed by the same rules, have the same power, and be subject to the same penalties as a board to determine the contested election of Governor and Lieutenant Governor under KRS

120.195

and as provided in this section. It shall report its decision to the house of the General Assembly by which it was appointed, for its further action.

The board shall, within twenty-four (24) hours of its selection, meet, appoint its chair, and assign a day for hearing the contest, and may adjourn from day to day as its business requires. If any member of the board willfully fails to attend its sessions, that member shall be reported to the house to which he or she belongs, and that house shall then, in its discretion, punish that member by fine or imprisonment, or both.

The board may, upon a majority vote, send for persons, papers, and records, including all voting equipment, ballots, boxes, and precinct rosters, and may issue subpoenas signed by its chair or the presiding officer of the house before which the contest is proceeding. The board or the presiding officer may also issue subpoenas for taking proof.

The board may use the services of any law enforcement agency to transport all records relating to the election contest, including voting equipment, ballots, boxes, and precinct rosters. All voting equipment, ballots, boxes, precinct rosters, and other voting records sent for by the board shall be sealed, to the extent possible, and transmitted in a tamper-resistant manner. The chain of custody for the records shall be recorded, in writing, on a form prescribed by the State Board of Elections in administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A to include the identity of the person or persons transferring and receiving the records, and the date, time, and location of the transfer. The clerk of the house before which the contest is proceeding shall be designated by the board as the custodian of the records while the records are in the possession of the board.

The board may order a recount of the election even if a recount has been conducted under KRS

120.157

or

120.185

. A recount ordered by the board may be conducted without prior approval of the house before which the contest is proceeding. The recount shall be conducted by:

The county clerk of the county or counties in which the precincts subject to the recount are located, if no recount of the election has been conducted; or

The State Board of Elections, if a recount has been conducted under KRS

120.157

or

120.185

, which shall:

Determine the number of persons required to conduct the recount, each of whom shall be a county clerk;

Select that number of clerks by placing the name of each county clerk in a box or similar receptacle, and after it has been well-shaken and well-intermixed, the chair of the State Board of Elections shall draw out one (1) name at a time, which shall be announced aloud. This process shall continue until the required number is obtained; and

Once completed, provide the results of the recount to the contest board.

The county clerk of any county containing precincts subject to the recount shall not be eligible to conduct the recount.

If it appears the candidates have received an equal number of legal votes cast, the right to the office shall be determined by lot, in the manner prescribed by the board, and under the direction of the board.

If the board finds the person returned is not legally qualified to receive the office at the time of his or her election, and if the house in which the contest is pending concurs under subsection (14) of this section, a vacancy shall exist, and a new election shall be ordered to fill the vacancy. If a new election is required, it shall be immediately ordered by proclamation of the presiding officer of the house before which the contest is proceeding who shall issue a writ of election. The writ shall be signed by the officer issuing it, shall designate the day for holding the election, and shall be directed to the proper sheriff or sheriffs as provided in KRS

118.740

.

If the board finds a person other than the one returned received the highest number of legal votes cast, and if the house in which the contest is pending concurs under subsection (14) of this section, he or she shall be adjudged the person elected and entitled to the office.

If the board is unable to decide the person entitled to the office, and if the house in which the contest is pending concurs under subsection (14) of this section, a vacancy shall exist, and a new election shall be ordered by that house of the General Assembly to fill the vacancy. If a new election is required, it shall be immediately ordered by proclamation of the presiding officer of the house before which the contest is proceeding who shall issue a writ of election. The writ shall be signed by the officer issuing it, shall designate the day for holding the election, and shall be directed to the proper sheriff or sheriffs as provided in KRS

118.740

.

When a new election is ordered, or the incumbent is adjudged not to be entitled to the office, his or her power shall immediately cease, and if the office is not adjudged to another, it shall be deemed vacant.

No decision shall be made but by the vote of a majority of the members of the board. The decision of the board shall not be final or conclusive, except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, but shall be reported to the house of the General Assembly by which it was appointed, for its further action.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 169; 2021 ch. 197, § 84, effective June 29, 2021.